Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.100

Bankruptcy—Contractual obligation to contain section.

Prior to the date that is three hundred sixty-six days after which the authority no longer has any bonds outstanding, the authority is prohibited from filing a voluntary petition under chapter 9 of the federal bankruptcy code or such corresponding chapter or section as may, from time to time, be in effect, and a public official or organization, entity, or other person shall not authorize the authority to be or become a debtor under chapter 9 or any successor or corresponding chapter or sections during such periods. This section shall be part of any contractual obligation owed to the holders of bonds issued under this chapter. Any such contractual obligation shall not subsequently be modified by state law during the period of the contractual obligation.

[ 2002 c 365 s 11.]